Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,352
Violations; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a minibike on any state highway except as permitted pursuant to section 60-6,353. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1972, LB 1196, § 8;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 103;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2107;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 448.